Arkansas, session 2025, SB393.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. This act shall be known and may be cited as
"Maighen's Law".

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 12-12-919(a), concerning lifetime
registration for certain sex offenders, is amended to read as follows:
(a) Lifetime registration is required for a sex offender who:
(1) Was found to have committed an aggravated sex offense;
(2) Was determined by the court to be or assessed as a Level 4
sexually dangerous person;
(3) Has pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to or been found
guilty of a second or subsequent sex offense under a separate case number,
not multiple counts on the same charge;
(4) Was convicted of rape by forcible compulsion, § 5-14-
103(a)(1), or other substantially similar offense in another jurisdiction; or
(5) Has pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to or been found
guilty of failing to comply with registration and reporting requirements
under § 12-12-904 three (3) or more times; or
*CEB095*
03/05/2025 1:47:28 PM CEB095

SB393
(6) At the time of the offense was more than twenty-four (24)
years of age and the victim of the offense was less than fifteen (15) years
of age.

































03/05/2025 1:47:28 PM CEB095